apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
    <pardef n="забира__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>х</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хме</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хте</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ха</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>л</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ла</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ло</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ли</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йки</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йте</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>х</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хме</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ше</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хте</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ше</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ха</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>л</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ла</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ло</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ли</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>м</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ме</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ш</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>т</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>щ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ща</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>що</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>щи</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>не</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="зачаква"><i>зачаква</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="забръмчава"><i>забръмчава</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="наплаща"><i>наплаща</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="пописва"><i>пописва</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="попревалява"><i>попревалява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="извисява"><i>извисява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="поинтересува"><i>поинтересува</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="поблизва"><i>поблизва</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="набъбря"><i>набъбря</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="нависява"><i>нависява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="избумтява"><i>избумтява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="поотбива"><i>поотбива</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="доплаща"><i>доплаща</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="поохладява"><i>поохладява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="позабърсва"><i>позабърсва</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="повалява"><i>повалява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="превалява"><i>превалява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="посъбира"><i>посъбира</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="поврещява"><i>поврещява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="понаболява"><i>понаболява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="заболява"><i>заболява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="забумтява"><i>забумтява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="почаква"><i>почаква</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="поописва"><i>поописва</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="избучава"><i>избучава</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="преболява"><i>преболява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="отболява"><i>отболява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="приболява"><i>приболява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="завалява"><i>завалява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="навалява"><i>навалява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="поприболява"><i>поприболява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="заблестява"><i>заблестява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="разбумтява"><i>разбумтява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="побръмчава"><i>побръмчава</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="поболява"><i>поболява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="понаписва"><i>понаписва</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="повисява"><i>повисява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="изврещява"><i>изврещява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="поразхладява"><i>поразхладява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="побира"><i>побира</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="разболява"><i>разболява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="понабира"><i>понабира</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="забира"><i>забира</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="пробумтява"><i>пробумтява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="доизплаща"><i>доизплаща</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="избръмчава"><i>избръмчава</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="избъбря"><i>избъбря</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="позахладява"><i>позахладява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="забучава"><i>забучава</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="телефонира"><i>телефонира</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="извалява"><i>извалява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="побоява"><i>побоява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="разбъбря"><i>разбъбря</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="побумтява"><i>побумтява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="разплаща"><i>разплаща</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="интересува"><i>интересува</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="избухтява"><i>избухтява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="прописва"><i>прописва</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="понавалява"><i>понавалява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="заврещява"><i>заврещява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="захладява"><i>захладява</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="побъбря"><i>побъбря</i><par n="забира__vblex"/></e>
